Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2505
Proof of authority; bond.

If no local administration or application or petition therefor is pending in this state, a domiciliary foreign personal representative may file with a court in this state in a county in which property belonging to the decedent is located, authenticated copies of his appointment and of any official bond he has given.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 211, UPC § 4-204.